Connecticut, session 2026, SB00205.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to require a
percentage of the revenue generated from the additional one per cent
sales and use taxes imposed on meals sold by an eating establishment,
caterer or grocery store be deposited in the Tourism Fund, established
under section 10-395b of the general statutes, to support the hospitality,
arts, culture and tourism needs of the state and related marketing
endeavors.